Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1910
Radiation-generating equipment, defined.

Radiation-generating equipment means any manufactured product or device, component part of such a product or device, or machine or system which during operation can generate or emit radiation except devices which emit radiation only from radioactive material.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 648.